Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
Article 3 Regulation of Farm Equipment Manufacturers, Distributors, and Dealers

13-8-31.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that the distribution of farm equipment in the State of Georgia vitally affects the general economy of the state and the public interest and public welfare and, in the exercise of its police power, it is necessary to regulate farm equipment manufacturers, distributors, dealers, and their representatives doing business in Georgia in order to prevent frauds, unfair business practices, unfair methods of competition, impositions, and other abuses upon its citizens.

History.
Code 1981, §13-8-31, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1585, § 4.

13-8-32.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Distributor” or “wholesaler” means any person, company, or corporation who purchases farm equipment or implements or parts from a manufacturer and resells the same at wholesale to dealers.

“Distributor or wholesaler branch” means a branch office maintained by a distributor or wholesaler which sells or distributes farm equipment or implements or parts to tractor or farm equipment dealers.

“Distributor representative” means a representative employed by a distributor branch or distributor.

“Factory branch” means a branch office maintained by a manufacturer which manufactures and assembles farm equipment or implements or parts for sale to distributors, tractor or farm equipment dealers, or wholesalers or which is maintained for directing and supervising the representatives of the manufacturer.

“Factory representative” means a representative employed by a manufacturer or employed by a factory branch for the purpose of making or promoting the sale of farm equipment or implements or parts or for supervising, servicing, instructing, or contracting with farm equipment dealers or prospective dealers or wholesalers.

“Farm equipment dealer” means any person who sells, solicits, or advertises the sale of farm equipment to the consuming public. It shall not include (A) receivers, trustees, administrators, executors, guardians, or other persons appointed by or acting under judgment, decree, or order of any court; (B) public officers while performing their duties as such officers; (C) persons making casual sales of their own item of farm equipment not subject to sales tax under the laws of the State of Georgia; (D) persons engaged in the auction sale of farm equipment; or (E) dealers in used farm equipment.

“Farm equipment or implements” means those farm implements primarily designed for use in agriculture.

“Franchise” means an oral or written agreement for a definite or indefinite period of time in which a manufacturer grants to a wholesaler permission to use a trade name, service mark, or related characteristic, and in which there is a community of interest in the marketing of farm equipment or implements or parts or services related thereto at wholesale whether by leasing, sale, or otherwise.

“Franchisee” means a wholesaler to whom a franchise is offered or granted.

“Franchisor” means a manufacturer who grants a franchise to a wholesaler.

“Fraud” means, in addition to its normal legal connotation, the following:a misrepresentation in any manner, whether intentionally false or arising from gross negligence, of a material fact; a promise or representation not made honestly and in good faith; or an intentional failure to disclose a material fact.

“Manufacturer” means any person engaged in the business of manufacturing or assembling farm equipment or implements or parts.

“New farm equipment or implements” means a unit of farm equipment or implement which has not been previously sold to and put into regular use or service by any person except a wholesaler for resale.

“Person” means a natural person, corporation, partnership, trust, or other business entity; and, in case of a business entity, it shall include any other entity in which it has a majority interest or effectively controls as well as the individual officers, directors, and other persons in active control of the activities of each such entity.

“Sale” means the issuance, transfer, agreement for transfer, exchange, pledge, hypothecation, or mortgage in any form, whether by transfer in trust or otherwise, of any unit of farm equipment or implement or parts or interest therein or of any franchise related thereto; any option, subscription or other contract, or solicitation, looking to a sale, or offer or attempt to sell in any form, whether in oral or written form.

History.
Code 1981, §13-8-32, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1585, § 4.

13-8-33.
Persons subject to provisions of article.

Any person who engages directly or indirectly in purposeful contacts within this state in connection with the offering or advertising for sale of farm machinery or implements and parts shall be subject to the provisions of this article and shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state upon service of process in accordance with the provisions of the laws of the State of Georgia.

History.
Code 1981, §13-8-33, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1585, § 4.

13-8-34.
Unfair competition; unfair or deceptive acts.

Unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices as defined in Code Section 13-8-35 are declared to be unlawful.

History.
Code 1981, §13-8-34, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1585, § 4.

13-8-35.
Unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices.

It shall be deemed a violation of Code Section 13-8-34 for any manufacturer, factory branch, factory representative, or wholesaler to engage in any action which is arbitrary, in bad faith, or unconscionable and which causes damage in terms of law or equity to any of the parties or to the public.

It shall be deemed a violation of Code Section 13-8-34 for a manufacturer, a factory branch or division, or officer, agent, or other representative thereof, to coerce, or attempt to coerce, any wholesaler:

To order or accept delivery of any unit of farm equipment or implements or parts or accessories therefor, or any other commodity or commodities which such wholesaler has not voluntarily ordered; or

To order or accept delivery of any farm equipment or implements with special features, accessories, or equipment not included in the base list price of such farm equipment or implements as publicly advertised by the manufacturer thereof.

It shall be deemed a violation of Code Section 13-8-34 for a manufacturer, a factory branch or division, or officer, agent, or other representative thereof:

To refuse to deliver in reasonable quantities and within a reasonable time after receipt of wholesaler’s order to any wholesaler having a franchise or contractual agreement for the sale of farm equipment or implements sold by such manufacturer or factory branch or division any item of farm equipment covered by such franchise or contract specifically advertised or represented by such manufacturer or factory branch or division to be available for immediate delivery; provided, however, the failure to deliver any such unit of farm equipment or implements shall not be considered a violation of this article if such failure is due to prudent and reasonable restriction on extension of credit by the franchisor to the wholesaler, an act of God, work stoppage or delay due to a strike or labor difficulty, a bona fide shortage of materials, freight embargo, or other cause over which the manufacturer or any agent thereof shall have no control;

To coerce or attempt to coerce any wholesaler to enter into any agreement, whether written or oral, supplementary to an existing franchise with such manufacturer, factory branch or division, or officer, agent, or other representative thereof; or to do any other act prejudicial to such wholesaler by threatening to cancel any franchise or any contractual agreement existing between such manufacturer or factory branch or division, and such wholesaler; provided, however, that notice in good faith to any wholesaler of such wholesaler’s violation of any terms or provisions of such franchise or contractual agreement shall not constitute a violation of this article if such notice is in writing mailed by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to such wholesaler at his current business address;

To terminate or cancel the franchise or selling agreement of any such wholesaler without due cause, as defined in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph. The nonrenewal of a franchise or selling agreement, without due cause, shall constitute an unfair termination or cancellation, regardless of the specified time period of such franchise or selling agreement. Except where the grounds for such termination or cancellation fall within division (iii) of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, such manufacturer or factory branch or division, or officer, agent, or other representative thereof shall notify a wholesaler in writing of the termination or cancellation of the franchise or selling agreement of such wholesaler at least 60 days before the effective date thereof, stating the specific grounds for such termination or cancellation; and in no event shall the contractual term of any such franchise or selling agreement expire without the written consent of the wholesaler involved prior to the expiration of at least 60 days following such written notice. During the 60 day period, either party may, in appropriate circumstances, petition a court to modify such 60 day stay or to extend it pending a final determination of such proceedings on the merits.The court shall have authority to grant preliminary and final injunctive relief.

As used in this paragraph, tests for determining what constitutes due cause for a manufacturer to terminate, cancel, or refuse to renew a franchise agreement shall include whether the wholesaler:

Has transferred an ownership interest in the business without the manufacturer’s consent;

Has made a material misrepresentation in applying for or acting under the franchise agreement;

Has filed a voluntary petition in bankruptcy or has had an involuntary petition in bankruptcy filed against the wholesaler which has not been discharged within 30 days after the filing, is in default under the provisions of a security agreement in effect with the manufacturer, or is in receivership;

Has engaged in an unfair business practice;

Has inadequately represented the manufacturer’s products with respect to sales, service, or warranty work;

Has engaged in conduct which is injurious or detrimental to the public welfare;

Has inadequate sales and service facilities and personnel;

Has failed to comply with an applicable licensing law;

Has been convicted of a crime, the effect of which would be detrimental to the manufacturer or wholesale business;

Has failed to operate in the normal course of business for seven consecutive business days;

Has relocated the wholesaler’s place of business without the manufacturer’s consent; or

Has failed to comply with the terms of the franchise agreement;

To resort to or use any false or misleading advertisement in connection with his business as such manufacturer, or factory branch or division, or officer, agent, or other representative thereof;

To offer to sell any unit of farm equipment or implements or parts or accessories therefor to any other wholesaler at a lower actual price therefor than the actual price offered to any other wholesaler for farm equipment or implement identically equipped; or to utilize any device including, but not limited to, sales promotion plans or programs which result in such lesser actual price; provided, however, the provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to sales to a wholesaler for resale to any unit of the United States government, the state, or any of its political subdivisions; and provided, further, that the provisions of this paragraph shall not apply so long as a manufacturer sells or offers to sell such new farm equipment or implement, parts, or accessories to all their franchised wholesalers at an equal price;

To discriminate willfully, either directly or indirectly, in price, programs, or terms of sale offered to franchisees, where the effect of such discrimination may be to lessen competition substantially or to give to one holder of a franchise any business or competitive advantage not offered to all holders of the same or similar franchise;

To prevent or attempt to prevent, by contract or otherwise, any wholesaler from changing the capital structure of his business or the means by or through which he finances the operation of his business, provided the wholesaler at all times meets any reasonable capital standards agreed to between the wholesaler and the manufacturer and provided such change by the wholesaler does not result in a change in the executive management of the wholesaler;

To prevent or attempt to prevent, by contract or otherwise, any wholesaler or any officer, partner, or stockholder of any wholesaler from selling or transferring any part of the interest of any of them to any other person or persons or party or parties; provided, however, that no wholesaler, officer, partner, or stockholder shall have the right to sell, transfer, or assign the franchise or power of management or control thereunder without the consent of the manufacturer, except that such consent shall not be unreasonably withheld;

To obtain money, goods, services, anything of value, or any other benefit from any other person with whom the wholesaler does business or employs on account of or in relation to the transactions between the wholesaler, the franchisor, and such other person; or

To require a wholesaler to assent to a release, assignment, notation, waiver, or estoppel which would relieve any person from liability imposed by this article.

It shall be deemed a violation of Code Section 13-8-34 for a wholesaler:

To require a purchaser of any unit of farm equipment or implement, as a condition of sale and delivery thereof, also to purchase special features, appliances, equipment, parts, or accessories not desired or requested by the purchaser; provided, however, that this prohibition shall not apply to special features, appliances, equipment, parts, or accessories which are already installed when a unit of farm equipment or implement is received by the wholesaler from the manufacturer thereof;

To represent and sell as new and unused any unit of farm equipment or implement which has been used and operated for demonstration or other purposes without stating to the purchaser the approximate amount of use the unit of farm machinery or implement has experienced; or

To resort to or use any false or misleading advertisement in connection with his business as such wholesaler.

No obsolete or superseded part may be returned, but any part listed in the manufacturer’s current parts price list at the date of notification to the wholesaler by the manufacturer of the surplus parts return program, or the date of a wholesaler’s parts return request, whichever is applicable, shall be eligible for return and credit as specified in this subsection; provided, however, that returned parts must be in new and unused condition and must have been purchased from the manufacturer to whom they are returned;

The minimum lawful credit to be allowed for returned parts shall be 85 percent of the wholesale cost thereof as listed in the manufacturer’s current parts price list at the date of the notification to the wholesaler by the manufacturer of the surplus parts return program, or the date of a wholesaler’s parts return request, whichever is applicable;

Applicable credit pursuant to this subsection must be issued to the wholesaler within 30 days after receipt of his returned parts by the manufacturer; and

Packing and return freight expense incurred in any return of surplus parts pursuant to the terms of this Code section shall be borne by the wholesaler.

History.
Code 1981, §13-8-35, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1585, § 4; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 13; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act was applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

13-8-36.
Predelivery and preparation obligations; repair parts availability; return of surplus parts inventory.

Every manufacturer shall specify and every wholesaler shall provide and fulfill reasonable predelivery and preparation obligations for its farm equipment or implements prior to delivery of same to purchasers.

Every manufacturer shall provide for repair parts availability throughout the reasonable useful life of any farm equipment or implement sold.

Every manufacturer shall provide to his wholesalers, on an annual basis, an opportunity to return a portion of his surplus parts inventory for credit.The surplus parts return procedure shall be administered as follows:

The manufacturer may specify and thereupon notify his wholesalers of a time period of at least 60 days’ duration, during which time wholesalers may submit their surplus parts list and return their surplus parts to the manufacturer;

If a manufacturer has not notified a wholesaler of a specific time period for returning surplus parts within the preceding 12 months, then he shall authorize and allow the wholesaler’s surplus parts return request within 30 days after receipt of such request from the wholesaler;

Pursuant to the provisions of this subsection, a manufacturer must allow surplus parts return authority on a dollar value of parts equal to 10 percent of the total dollar value of purchases by the wholesaler from the manufacturer during the 12 month period immediately preceding the notification to the wholesaler by the manufacturer of the surplus parts return program, or the month the wholesaler’s return request is made, whichever is applicable; provided, however, that the wholesaler may, at his option, elect to return a dollar value of his surplus parts less than 10 percent of the total dollar value of purchases by the wholesaler from the manufacturer during the preceding 12 month period as provided in this subsection;

History.
Code 1981, §13-8-36, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1585, § 4.

13-8-37.
Warranty agreements; disapproval of claims under warranty agreements; special handling of claims; calculation of compensation to dealer for warranty work.

Every manufacturer or factory branch or division shall reimburse its wholesalers for any expenses they incur in complying with the provisions of Georgia laws pertaining to warranty requirements for farm equipment or implements as they apply to products of the manufacturer.

History.
Code 1981, §13-8-37, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1585, § 4.

13-8-38.
Agreements to which article shall apply.

The provisions of this article shall apply to all written or oral agreements between a manufacturer with a wholesaler including, but not limited to, the franchise offering, the franchise agreement, sales of goods, services and advertising, leases or mortgages of real or personal property, promises to pay, security interests, pledges, insurance contracts, advertising contracts, construction or installation contracts, servicing contracts, and all other such agreements in which the manufacturer has any direct or indirect interest.

History.
Code 1981, §13-8-38, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1585, § 4.

13-8-39.
Failure to renew, termination of, or restriction on transfer of franchise without due cause.

It shall be unlawful for the manufacturer or franchisor, without due cause, to fail to renew on terms then equally available to all its wholesalers, to terminate a franchise, or to restrict the transfer of a franchise unless the franchisee shall receive fair and reasonable compensation for the inventory of the business.As used in this Code section, “due cause” shall be construed in accordance with the definition of same as contained in subparagraph (c)(3)(B) of Code Section 13-8-35.

History.
Code 1981, §13-8-39, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1585, § 4.

13-8-40.
Damages recoverable for injuries sustained by violations of article; class actions; punitive damages.

In addition to temporary or permanent injunctive relief as provided in subparagraph (c)(3)(A) of Code Section 13-8-35, any person who shall be injured in his business or property by reason of anything forbidden in this article may bring an action therefor in the appropriate superior court of this state and shall recover the actual damages sustained and the costs of such action, including a reasonable attorney’s fee.

When such action is one of common or general interest to many persons or when the parties are numerous and it is impracticable to bring them all before the court, one or more may bring a class action for the benefit of the whole, including actions for injunctive relief.

In an action for money damages, if the jury finds that the defendant acted maliciously, the jury may award punitive damages as permitted by Georgia law.

History.
Code 1981, §13-8-40, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1585, § 4.

13-8-41.
Contracts and agreements in violation of article as void.

Any contract or franchise agreement or part thereof or practice thereunder in violation of any provision of this article shall be deemed against public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.

History.
Code 1981, §13-8-41, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1585, § 4.

13-8-42.
Repurchase of inventory upon termination of franchise; payment for inventory repurchased; title to repurchased inventory; exempt inventory items; civil liability for failure to repurchase inventory.

Whenever any wholesaler enters into a franchise agreement with a manufacturer wherein the wholesaler agrees to maintain an inventory of farm equipment or implements or repair parts and the franchise is subsequently terminated, the manufacturer shall repurchase the inventory as provided in this article. The wholesaler may keep the inventory if he desires. If the wholesaler has any outstanding debts to the manufacturer, then the repurchase amount may be credited to the wholesaler’s account.

The manufacturer shall repurchase that inventory previously purchased from him and held by the wholesaler on the date of termination of the contract. The manufacturer shall pay 100 percent of the actual wholesaler’s cost, including freight, of all new, unsold, undamaged, and complete units of farm equipment or implements which are resalable, all demonstrator units of farm equipment or implements, and 100 percent of the current wholesale price of all new, unused, undamaged repair parts and accessories which are listed in the manufacturer’s current parts price list. The manufacturer shall pay the wholesaler 5 percent of the current wholesale price on all new, unused, and undamaged repair parts returned to cover the cost of handling, packing, and loading.

Upon payment within a reasonable time of the repurchase amount to the wholesaler, the title and right of possession to the repurchased inventory shall transfer to the manufacturer.

The provisions of this article shall not require the repurchase from a wholesaler of:

Any repair part which has a limited storage life or is otherwise subject to deterioration;

Any single repair part which is priced as a set of two or more items;

Any repair part which, because of its condition, is not resalable as a new part without repackaging or reconditioning;

Any inventory for which the wholesaler is unable to furnish evidence, reasonably satisfactory to the manufacturer, of good title, free and clear of all claims, liens, and encumbrances;

Any inventory which the wholesaler desires to keep, provided the wholesaler has a contractual right to do so;

Any unit of farm equipment or implement which is not in new, unused, undamaged, complete condition, except units that have been used by the wholesaler as demonstrators;

Any repair parts which are not in new, unused, undamaged condition;

Any inventory which was ordered by the wholesaler on or after the date of receipt of the notification of termination of the franchise; or

Any inventory which was acquired by the wholesaler from any source other than the manufacturer.

If any manufacturer shall fail or refuse to repurchase any inventory covered under the provisions of this article within 60 days after termination of a wholesaler’s contract, he shall be civilly liable for 100 percent of the current wholesale price of the inventory plus any freight charges paid by the wholesaler, the wholesaler’s reasonable attorney’s fees, court costs, and interest on the current wholesale price computed at the legal interest rate from the sixty-first day after termination.

History.
Code 1981, §13-8-42, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1585, § 4.

13-8-43.
Repurchase of inventory upon death or incapacity of dealer or majority stockholder of corporate dealer.

In the event of the death or incapacity of the wholesaler or the majority stockholder of a corporation operating as a wholesaler, the manufacturer shall, at the option of the heirs at law if the wholesaler died intestate, or the devisees or transferees under the terms of the deceased wholesaler’s last will and testament if said wholesaler died testate, repurchase the inventory from said heirs or devisees as aforesaid as if the manufacturer had terminated the contract, and the inventory repurchase provisions of Code Section 13-8-42 are made expressly applicable hereto.The heirs or devisees as aforesaid shall have one year from the date of the death of the wholesaler or majority stockholder to exercise their option under this article; provided, however, that nothing in this article shall require the repurchase of inventory if the heirs or devisees as aforesaid and the manufacturer enter into a new franchise agreement to operate the wholesale business.

History.
Code 1981, §13-8-43, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1585, § 4.

13-8-44.
Indemnification of dealer for losses relating to manufacture, assembly, design, or functions beyond control of dealer.

A manufacturer will fully indemnify and hold harmless its wholesaler against any losses including, but not limited to, court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees or damages arising out of complaints, claims, or lawsuits including, but not limited to, strict liability, negligence, misrepresentation, express or implied warranty, or rescission of the sale where the complaint, claim, or lawsuit relates to the manufacture, assembly, or design of new items covered by this article, parts or accessories, or other functions by the manufacturer which are beyond the control of the wholesaler.

History.
Code 1981, §13-8-44, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1585, § 4.

13-8-45.
Applicability of article to existing contracts without expiration dates and to contracts entered or renewed after November 1, 1982.

The provisions of this article shall apply to all contracts now in effect which have no expiration date and are a continuing contract and all other contracts entered into or renewed after November 1, 1982. Any contract in force and effect on November 1, 1982, which by its own terms will terminate on a date subsequent thereto shall be governed by the law as it existed prior to this article.

History.
Code 1981, §13-8-45, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1585, § 4.